West Virginia, session 2026, HB4147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9A. TOBACCO USAGE RESTRICTIONS. §16-9A-6. Use or possession of tobacco products by persons under the age of 21; penalties. (a) It is unlawful for any person under the age of 21 to possess or use any tobacco product. (b) Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as follows:(1) First offense - fined $50 and eight hours of community service; (2) Second offense - fined $100 and 16 hours of community service; and(3) Third and each subsequent offense - fined $200 and 24 hours of community service.(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of §49-4-101 et seq. of this code, the magistrate court has concurrent jurisdiction over offenses under this section.(d) Individuals under 21 assisting in tobacco compliance inspections under §16-9A-7 of this code are not guilty of violating this section if the possession of the tobacco product is a part of such inspections.